Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5359.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 12-5 of the General Laws entitled "Search Warrants" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
12-5-11. Audio and video recording of private property prohibited.
(a) It shall be unlawful for any law enforcement officer or peace officer as defined in § 12-
7-21, to place on the private property of another, any audio or video recording device(s) to capture,
generate, preserve, transmit or otherwise document the activities on that person’s property without
their consent or without a valid search warrant issued by a neutral and detached magistrate or judge
upon a finding of probable cause.
(b) Any audio or video evidence generated in violation of subsection (a) of this section
shall be inadmissible in any criminal or civil proceeding filed against the property owner and/or
their tenants or guests.
SECTION 2. Chapter 12-12 of the General Laws entitled "Indictments, Informations and
Complaints" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
12-12-23. Acquittal in another jurisdiction as bar to prosecution.
If a violation of any criminal law is a violation of a federal law or the law of another state,
an acquittal under federal law or the law of another state for the same set of facts or acts is a bar to
prosecution in this state, unless there exists newly discovered evidence which would substantially
indicate that prosecution in this state is warranted.

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000833
========
LC000833 - Page 2 of 3